Massachusetts, session 194th, H1443.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
There is hereby established a pilot reimbursement program for all public institutions of
higher education in the Commonwealth, including all state universities, community colleges and
University of Massachusetts campuses, providing tuition and fee waivers for senior citizens age
60 and older pursuant to the provisions of section 19 of chapter 15A of the General Laws. Said
tuition and fee waivers shall apply to qualifying seniors who are enrolled in undergraduate
programs, summer sessions, evening classes, or any specific higher education courses or set of
courses between July 1, 2025 and June 30, 2026, but said enrollment shall be subject to space
availability and shall not exceed four courses per academic year. On or before August 1, 2026,
all state universities, community colleges and University of Massachusetts campuses shall
provide the state Comptroller, the House and Senate Ways and Means Committees, and the Joint
of 2

Committee on Higher Education with a detailed breakdown of the tuition and fee revenues
foregone as a result of said waivers. Upon receipt and certification of said figures, the
Comptroller is hereby authorized and directed to transfer money from the General Fund to each
state university, community college and University of Massachusetts campus in an amount equal
to its foregone tuition and fee revenues. The total revenues reimbursed as part of the pilot
program shall serve as the base funding level to cover the annual cost of senior citizen tuition
and fee waivers in the General Appropriations Act beginning in Fiscal Year 2027.
of 2